California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any liability for an addition to the tax which arises from the failure to pay or deposit a tax withheld or collected from others and required
 to be paid to the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 285.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19164.

(a) (1) (A) An accuracy-related penalty shall be imposed under this part and shall be determined in accordance with Section 6662 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to imposition of accuracy-related penalty on underpayments, except as otherwise provided.

(B) (i) Except for understatements relating to reportable transactions to which Section 19164.5 applies, in the case of any proposed deficiency assessment issued after the last date of the amnesty period specified in Chapter 9.1 (commencing with Section 19730) for any taxable year beginning prior to January 1, 2003, the penalty specified in Section 6662(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be computed by substituting “40 percent” for “20
 percent.”

(ii) Clause (i) shall not apply to any taxable year of a taxpayer beginning prior to January 1, 2003, if, as of the start date of the amnesty program period specified in Section 19731, the taxpayer is then under audit by the Franchise Tax Board, or the taxpayer has filed a protest under Section 19041, or the taxpayer has filed an appeal under Section 19045, or the taxpayer is engaged in settlement negotiations under Section 19442, or the taxpayer has a pending judicial proceeding in any court of this state or in any federal court relating to the tax liability of the taxpayer for that taxable year.

(2) With respect to corporations, this subdivision shall apply to all of the following:

(A) All taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990.

(B) Any other taxable year for which an assessment is made after July 16, 1991.

(C) For purposes of this section, references in Section 6662(e) of the Internal Revenue Code and the regulations thereunder, relating to treatment of an affiliated group that files a consolidated federal return, are modified to apply to those entities required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110. For these purposes, entities included in a combined report pursuant to paragraph (4) or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 25110 shall be considered only to the extent required to be included in the combined report.

(3) Section 6662(d)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to provide that in the case of a corporation, other than an “S” corporation, there is a substantial understatement of tax for any taxable year if the amount of the understatement for the
 taxable year exceeds the lesser of:

(A) Ten percent of the tax required to be shown on the return for the taxable year (or, if greater, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500)).

(B) Five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(4) Section 6662(d)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to additionally provide that the excess determined under Section 6662(d)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be determined without regard to items to which Section 19164.5 applies and without regard to items with respect to which a penalty is imposed by Section 19774.

(5) The provisions of Sections 6662(e)(1) and 6662(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to returns filed on or after January 1, 2010.

(b) The amendments made by Section 605(a)(2) of Public Law 117-328 adding Sections 6662(b)(10) and 6662(h)(2)(D) to, and amending Section 6664(c)(2) of, the Internal Revenue Code, relating to application of accuracy-related penalties, shall apply to returns filed on or after January 1, 2024. 

(c) For purposes of Section 6662(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, Section 6664 of the Internal Revenue Code, Section 6694(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, and this part, the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe a list of positions for which the Franchise Tax Board believes there is not substantial authority or there is no reasonable belief that the tax treatment is more likely than not the proper tax treatment. That list (and any revisions thereof) shall be published through the use of Franchise Tax Board Notices or other published positions. In addition, the “listed transactions” identified and published pursuant to the preceding sentence shall be published on the internet website of the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) A fraud penalty shall be imposed under this part and shall be determined in accordance with Section 6663 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to imposition of fraud penalty, except as otherwise provided.

(e) (1) Section 6664 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to definitions and special rules, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) Section 6664(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to returns filed on or after January 1, 2010.

(3) Section 6664(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to appraisals prepared with respect to returns or submissions filed on or after January 1, 2010.

(f) Except for purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 19774, Section 6662(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(g) Except for purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 19774, Section 6662(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to increase in penalty in case of nondisclosed noneconomic substance transactions, shall not apply.

(h) Section 6665 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to applicable rules, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(i) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 14 of the Statutes of 2011 shall apply to notices mailed on or after January 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 29.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

19164.1.

(a) Any understatement determined pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 19164 (relating to the accuracy-related penalty) may not include amounts that are attributable to the credit allowed under Section 17052.2 (relating to the teacher retention tax credit).

(b) This section applies only to tax credits claimed under Section 17052.2 for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19164.5.

(a) A reportable transaction accuracy-related penalty shall be imposed under this part and shall be determined in accordance with Section 6662A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the imposition of an accuracy-related penalty on understatements with respect to reportable transactions, except as otherwise provided.

(b) (1) The reportable transaction understatement, as determined under Section 6662A(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, is modified
 to not include amounts to which the penalty of Section 19774 is imposed.

(2) Section 6662A(b)(1)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to substitute the phrase “Sections 17041, 23151, 23181, or 23501” for “section 1 (section 11 in the case of a taxpayer which is a corporation).”

(3) Section 6662A(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to substitute the phrase “Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001)” for “subtitle A.”

(4) Section 6662A(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to substitute the phrase “income or franchise tax” for “Federal income tax.”

(5) Section 6662A(e)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to additionally provide that the amount of the understatement is
 increased by noneconomic transaction understatements, as defined in Section 19774.

(c) Section 6662A(e)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to additionally provide that Section 6662A of the Internal Revenue Code does not apply to amounts to which a penalty is imposed under Section 19774.

(d) The provisions of subdivision (f) of Section 19772, relating to the rescission of the penalty by the Chief Counsel, shall apply to any penalty imposed by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 47.2.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19166.

(a) A penalty shall be imposed for understatement of any taxpayer’s liability by a tax return preparer and shall be determined in accordance with Section 6694 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to understatement of taxpayer’s liability by tax return preparer, except as otherwise provided.

(b) (1) Except as
 provided in paragraph (2), Section 6694(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to substitute “$250” for “$1,000.”

(2) For taxpayers that have a reportable transaction, as defined in Section 6707A(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, with respect to which the requirements of Section 6664(d)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code are not met, any listed transaction, as defined in Section 6707A(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a gross misstatement within the meaning of Section 6404(g)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, paragraph (1) shall not apply.

(c) Section 6694(c) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply and, in lieu thereof, the following shall apply:

(1) If, within 30 days after the day on which notice and demand of any penalty under Section 6694(a) or 6694(b) of the Internal Revenue Code is made
 against any person who is an income tax return preparer, that person pays an amount which is not less than 15 percent of the amount of that penalty and files a claim for refund of the amount so paid, no levy or proceeding in court for the collection of the remainder of that penalty shall be made, begun, or prosecuted until the final resolution of a proceeding begun as provided in paragraph (2). Notwithstanding Section 19381, the beginning of that proceeding or levy during the time that prohibition is in force may be enjoined in a proceeding in the superior court. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit any counterclaim for the remainder of that penalty in a proceeding begun as provided in paragraph (2). 

(2) If, within 30 days after the day on which a claim for refund of any partial payment of any penalty under Section 6694(a) or 6694(b) of the Internal Revenue Code is denied (or, if earlier, within 30 days after the expiration
 of six months after the day on which the claim for refund has been filed), the income tax return preparer fails to begin a proceeding in the superior court for the determination of his or her liability for that penalty, paragraph (1) shall cease to apply with respect to that penalty, effective on the day following the close of the applicable 30-day period referred to in this paragraph.

(3) The running of the period of limitations provided in Section 19371 on the collection by levy or by a proceeding in court in respect of any penalty described in paragraph (1) shall be suspended for the period during which the Franchise Tax Board is prohibited from collecting by levy or a proceeding in court.

(d) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to returns prepared after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 47.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19167.

(a) A penalty shall be imposed under this section for any of the following:

(1) In accordance with Section 6695(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, for failure to furnish a copy of the return to the taxpayer, as required by Section 18625.

(2) In accordance with Section 6695(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, for failure to furnish an identifying number, as required by Section 18624.

(3) In accordance with Section 6695(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, for failure to retain a copy or list, as required by Section 18625 or for failure to retain an electronic filing
 declaration, as required by Section 18621.5.

(4) Failure to register as a tax preparer with the California Tax Education Council, as required by Section 22253 of the Business and Professions Code, unless it is shown that the failure was due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect.

(A) The amount of the penalty under this paragraph for the first failure to register is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). This penalty shall be waived if proof of registration is provided to the Franchise Tax Board within 90 days from the date notice of the penalty is mailed to the tax preparer.

(B) The amount of the penalty under this paragraph for a failure to register, other than the first failure to register, is
 five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(C) The Franchise Tax Board shall not impose the penalties authorized by this paragraph until either one of the following has occurred:

(i) Commencing January 1, 2006, and continuing each year thereafter, there is an appropriation in the Franchise Tax Board’s annual budget to fund the costs associated with the penalty authorized by this paragraph.

(ii) (I) An agreement has been executed between the California Tax Education Council and the Franchise Tax Board that provides that an amount equal to all first year costs associated with the penalty authorized by this paragraph shall be received by the Franchise Tax Board. For purposes of this subclause, first year costs
 include, but are not limited to, costs associated with the development of processes or systems changes, if necessary, and labor.

(II) An agreement has been executed between the California Tax Education Council and the Franchise Tax Board that provides that the annual costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board associated with the penalty authorized by this paragraph shall be reimbursed by the California Tax Education Council to the Franchise Tax Board.

(III) Pursuant to the agreement described in subclause (I), the Franchise Tax Board has received an amount equal to the first year costs described in that subclause.

(5) In accordance with Section 6695(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to failure to be diligent
 in determining eligibility for certain tax benefits.

(b) Section 6695(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to adjustment for inflation, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 70.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

19168.

The following rules shall apply to any penalty imposed under Section 19166 or 19167:

(a) The penalties shall be in addition to any other penalties provided by law.

(b) Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031) of this chapter (relating to deficiency assessments) shall not be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19169.

(a) In addition to the criminal penalty provided by Section 19712, any tax preparer who endorses or otherwise negotiates (directly or through an agent) any warrant made in respect of the taxes imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) which is issued to a taxpayer (other than the tax preparer) shall pay a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) with respect to each warrant. The preceding sentence shall not apply with respect to the deposit by a bank (as
 defined by Section 581 of the Internal Revenue Code) of the full amount of the warrant in the taxpayer’s account in that bank for the benefit of the taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), “tax preparer” means any person who prepares for compensation, or who employs one or more persons to prepare for compensation, any return of tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) or any claim for refund of tax imposed by Part 10 or Part 11. For purposes of the preceding sentence, the preparation of a substantial portion of a return or claim for refund shall be treated as if it were the preparation of that return or claim for refund.

A person shall not be a “tax preparer” merely because the person does any of the following:

(1) Furnishes typing, reproducing, or other mechanical
 assistance.

(2) Prepares a return or claim for refund of the employer (or of an officer or employee of the employer) by whom that person is regularly and continuously employed.

(3) Prepares as a fiduciary a return or claim for refund for any person.

(c) This section shall not apply where the tax preparer has advanced the taxpayer an amount of money equal to or greater than the amount of the taxpayer’s refund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19170.

(a) An income tax preparer that is subject to Section 18621.9 is liable for a penalty in the amount of fifty dollars ($50) for each acceptable individual income tax return prepared by that income tax preparer that is not electronically filed, unless it is shown that the failure to electronically file that acceptable individual income tax return is due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect.

(b) For purposes of this section, reasonable cause includes, but is not limited to, a taxpayer’s election not to electronically file an acceptable individual income tax return in compliance with Section 18621.9.

(c) This section shall apply to acceptable individual income tax returns required to be filed on or after January 1, 2005.

(History: Repealed (by Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 267, Sec. 3.   Effective August 23, 2004.   Added section applicable January 1, 2005, as provided in subd. (c).)
-------------------------------------------

19171.

(a) A business entity required to electronically file a return pursuant to Section 18621.10 that files a return in a manner that fails to comply with Section 18621.10, shall be subject to a penalty in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) for an initial failure and a penalty in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) for each subsequent failure unless the failure is due to reasonable cause, and not willful neglect.

(b) If a group return is filed on behalf of eligible electing taxpayer members of a combined reporting group, the penalties described in subdivision (a) shall apply to the combined reporting group and not to a taxpayer member of the combined reporting group.

(c) This section shall apply to returns filed for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 478, Sec. 6.   (AB 2754)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

19172.

(a) In addition to the penalty imposed by Section 19706 (relating to willful failure to file return, supply information, or pay tax), if any partnership required to file a return under Section 18633 or 18633.5 for any taxable year does either of the following:

(1) Fails to file the return at the time prescribed therefor (determined with
 regard to any extension of time for filing).

(2) Files a return which fails to show the information required under Section 18633 or 18633.5, that partnership shall be liable for a penalty determined under subdivision (b) for each month (or fraction thereof) during which that failure continues (but not to exceed 12 months), unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the amount determined under this subdivision for any month is the product of the following:

(1) Eighteen dollars ($18), multiplied by

(2) The number of persons who were partners in the partnership during any part of the taxable year.

(c) The penalty imposed by subdivision
 (a) shall be assessed against the partnership.

(d) Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031) of this chapter (relating to deficiency assessments) shall not apply with respect to the assessment or collection of any penalty imposed by subdivision (a).

(e) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to returns required to be filed after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 48.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19172.5.

(a) In addition to the penalty imposed by Section 19706, if any “S” corporation required to file a return under Section 18601 for any taxable year fails to file the return at the time prescribed therefor (determined with regard to any extension of time for filing), or files a return that fails to show the information required under Section 18601, then that “S” corporation shall be liable for a penalty determined under subdivision (b) for each month (or
 fraction thereof) during which that failure continues (but not to exceed 12 months), unless that failure is due to reasonable cause.

(b) (1) For purposes of subdivision (a), the amount determined under this subdivision for any month is the product of the following:

(2) Eighteen dollars ($18), multiplied by the number of persons who were shareholders in the “S” corporation during any part of the taxable year.

(c) The penalty imposed by subdivision (a) shall be assessed against the “S” corporation.

(d) Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031), relating to deficiency assessments, shall not apply with respect to the assessment or collection of any penalty imposed by subdivision (a).

(e) This section shall apply to returns required to be filed after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 49.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19173.

(a) A penalty shall be imposed under this part for failure to maintain lists of advisees with respect to reportable transactions and shall be determined in accordance with Section 6708 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided.

(b) If a material advisor fails to meet the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 18648 with respect to a listed transaction, as defined in Section 6707A(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, an additional penalty shall be
 imposed equal to the greater of:

(1) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(2) Fifty percent of the gross income that the material advisor derived from that activity.

(c) A penalty imposed under this section does not apply if it is shown that the additional information required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 18648 was not identified in a Franchise Tax Board notice issued prior to the date the transaction or shelter was entered into.

(d) The penalty imposed by subdivision (a) shall be assessed against the person required to maintain or provide a list under Section 18648. The penalty may be assessed at any time during the period ending eight years after the failure has occurred.

(e) (1) The Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board may rescind all or any portion of any penalty imposed by this section with respect to a list required to be maintained or provided under Section 18648, if all of the following apply:

(A) The violation is with respect to a reportable transaction, other than a listed transaction, as defined in Section 6707A(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) The person on whom the penalty is imposed has a history of complying with the requirements of this part and Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(C) It is shown that the violation is due to an unintentional mistake of fact.

(D) Imposing the penalty would be against equity and good
 conscience.

(E) Rescinding the penalty would promote compliance with the requirements of this part and Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) and effective tax administration.

(2) The exercise of authority under paragraph (1) shall be at the sole discretion of the Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board and may not be delegated.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law or rule of law, any determination under this subdivision may not be reviewed in any administrative or judicial proceeding.

(f) Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031) of this chapter (relating to deficiency assessments) shall not apply with respect to the assessment or collection of any penalty imposed by subdivision (a).

(g) The penalty imposed by this section is in addition to any penalty imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 47.4.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19175.

(a) In addition to the penalty imposed by Section 19183 (relating to failure to file information returns), if any person or entity fails to report amounts paid as remuneration for personal services as required under Section 13050 of the Unemployment Insurance Code or Section 18631 on the date prescribed therefor (determined with regard to any extension of time for filing), that person or entity may be liable for a penalty determined under subdivision (b).

(b) For purposes
 of subdivision (a), the amount determined under this subdivision is the maximum rate under Section 17041 multiplied by the unreported amounts paid as remuneration for personal services.

(c) The penalty imposed by subdivision (a) shall be assessed against that person or entity required to file a return under Section 13050 of the Unemployment Insurance Code or Section 18631.

(d) Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031) of this chapter (relating to deficiency assessments) shall not apply with respect to the assessment or collection of any penalty imposed by subdivision (a).

(e) The penalty imposed under subdivision (a) shall be in lieu of the penalty imposed under Section 13052.5 of the Unemployment Insurance Code (relating to unreported compensation). In the event that a penalty is imposed under this section and
 Section 13052.5 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, only the penalty imposed under Section 13052.5 of the Unemployment Insurance Code shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 156, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19176.

(a) In addition to any criminal penalty provided by law if:

(1) Any individual makes a statement under Section 13040, 13041, or 13042 of the Unemployment Insurance Code which results in a decrease in the amounts deducted and withheld under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code; and

(2) As of the time the statement was made, there was no
 reasonable basis for the statement, the individual shall pay a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for the statement. Any penalty so imposed shall be paid upon notice and demand from the Franchise Tax Board and shall be collected as a tax.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may waive (in whole or in part) the penalty imposed under subdivision (a) if the taxes imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) with respect to the individual for the taxable year are equal to or less than the sum of both of the following:

(1) The credits against those taxes allowed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 17041) of Part 10 and Section 19002.

(2) The payments of estimated tax which are considered payments on account of those taxes.

(c) This section supersedes
 Section 13101 of the Unemployment Insurance Code and shall apply to acts and failures to act after December 31, 1981.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19177.

A penalty shall be imposed for promoting abusive tax shelters and shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of Section 6700 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 47.5.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19178.

A penalty shall be imposed for aiding and abetting understatement of tax liability. The penalty shall be determined in accordance with Section 6701 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19179.

(a) A penalty shall be imposed for filing a frivolous return and shall be determined in accordance with Section 6702 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 6702 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applied to returns required to be filed under this part.

(c) Section 6702 of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(1) (A) By substituting the phrase “tax imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part” for the phrase “tax imposed by this title” contained therein.

(B) By substituting the phrase “frivolous or is based on a position that the Franchise Tax Board has identified as frivolous under subdivision (d) of Section 19179” for the term “frivolous” contained therein.

(C) By substituting the phrase “reflects a desire to delay or impede the administration of federal income tax laws as determined by the Secretary of the Treasury or the administration of the tax imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part
 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part as determined by the Franchise Tax Board” for the phrase “reflects a desire to delay or impede the administration of Federal tax laws” contained therein.

(D) By substituting the phrase “is based on a position which the Secretary of the Treasury has identified as frivolous under Section 6702(c) of the Internal Revenue Code or the Franchise Tax Board has identified as frivolous under subdivision (d)” for the phrase “is based on a position which the Secretary has identified as frivolous under subsection (c).”

(E) By substituting the phrase “If the Franchise Tax Board provides a person with notice that a submission is a specified frivolous submission and the person withdraws that submission within 30 days after the notice, the penalty imposed under Section 6702(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code does not apply with respect to that
 submission” for the phrase “If the Secretary provides a person with notice that a submission is a specified frivolous submission and such person withdraws such submission within 30 days after such notice, the penalty imposed under paragraph (1) shall not apply with respect to such submission.”

(2) Section 6702(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply and, in lieu thereof, the phrase “specified submission” means any of the following:

(A) A protest under Section 19041.

(B) A request for a hearing under Section 19044.

(C) An application under any of the following sections:

(i) Section 19008, relating to agreements for payment of tax liability in installments.

(ii) Section 19443, relating to compromises.

(iii) Section 21004, relating to actions of the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate.

(iv) Section 21015.5, relating to a request for review prior to levy.

(d) (1) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe (and periodically revise) a list of positions which the Secretary of the Treasury for federal income tax purposes or the Franchise Tax Board has identified as being frivolous for purposes of this section.

(2) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or prescribed by the
 Franchise Tax Board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(e) (1) The Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board may rescind all or any portion of any penalty imposed by this section if both of the following apply:

(A) Imposing the penalty would be against equity and good conscience.

(B) Rescinding the penalty would promote compliance with the requirements of this part and Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) and effective tax administration.

(2) The exercise of authority under paragraph (1) shall be at the sole discretion of the Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board and may not be delegated.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law or
 rule of law, any determination under this subdivision may not be reviewed in any administrative or judicial proceeding.

(f) The penalties imposed by this section shall be in addition to any other penalty provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 50.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19180.

(a) In any proceeding involving the issue of whether or not any person is liable for a penalty under Section 19177, 19178, or 19179, the burden of proof with respect to that issue shall be on the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) Sections 19041 to 19049, inclusive, (relating to deficiency procedures) shall not apply with respect to the assessment or collection of the penalties provided by Section 19177, 19178, or 19179.

(c) (1) If, within 30 days after the day on which notice and demand of any penalty under Section 19177 or 19178 is made against any person, that person pays an amount which is not less than 15 percent of the amount of that penalty and files a claim for refund of the amount so paid, no levy or proceeding in court for the collection of the remainder of that penalty shall be made, begun, or prosecuted until the final resolution of a proceeding begun as provided in paragraph (2). Notwithstanding Section 19381, the beginning of that proceeding or levy during the time that prohibition is in force may be enjoined by a proceeding in the superior court. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prohibit any counterclaim for the remainder of that penalty in a proceeding begun as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) If, within 30 days after the day on which the claim for refund of any partial payment of any penalty under
 Section 19177 or 19178 is denied (or, if earlier, within 30 days after the expiration of six months after the day on which a claim for refund was filed), the person fails to begin a proceeding in the superior court for the determination of the liability for that penalty, paragraph (1) shall cease to apply with respect to that penalty, effective on the day following the close of the applicable 30-day period referred to in this paragraph.

(3) The running of the period of limitations provided in Section 19371 on the collection by levy or by a proceeding in court in respect of any penalty described in paragraph (1) shall be suspended for the period during which the Franchise Tax Board is prohibited from collecting by levy or a proceeding in court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 374, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19181.

A penalty shall be imposed for failing to meet the requirements of Section 18649, relating to original issue discount reporting requirements with respect to any person subject to tax under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001). The penalty shall be determined in accordance with Section 6706 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19182.

(a) A penalty shall be imposed for failure to furnish information pursuant to Section 18628 and shall be determined in accordance with Section 6707 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to failure to furnish information regarding reportable transactions, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031) of this chapter (relating to deficiency assessments) does not apply in respect of the assessment or collection of any penalty imposed under
 this section.

(c) A penalty under this section does not apply if it is shown that the additional information required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 18628 was not identified in a Franchise Tax Board notice issued prior to the date the transaction or shelter was entered into.

(d) The provisions of subdivision (e) of Section 19173, relating to the rescission of the penalty by the Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board, shall apply to any penalty imposed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 47.7.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19182.5.

(a) A penalty shall be imposed for failing to meet the requirements of Section 18648.5 and the penalty amount shall be determined in accordance with Section 6714 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) No penalty shall be imposed under paragraph (1) upon a showing that the requirements in Section 6115 of the Internal Revenue Code have been met with respect to that contribution for federal purposes.

(c) The
 provisions of this section shall apply to quid pro quo contributions made on or after January 1, 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 61.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19183.

(a) (1) A penalty shall be imposed for failure to file correct information returns, as required by this part, and that penalty shall be determined in accordance with Section 6721 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to failure to file correct information returns.

(2) Section 6721(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to penalty in case of intentional disregard, is modified to the extent that the reference to Section 6041A(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to direct sales of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more, does not apply.

(b) (1) A penalty shall be imposed
 for failure to furnish correct payee statements as required by this part, and that penalty shall be determined in accordance with Section 6722 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to failure to furnish correct payee statements.

(2) Section 6722(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exception for de minimis failures, is modified to the extent that the references to Sections 6041A(b) and 6041A(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to direct sales of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more, and statements to be furnished to persons with respect to whom information is required to be furnished, does not apply.

(c) A penalty shall be imposed for failure to comply with other information reporting requirements under this part, and that penalty shall be determined in
 accordance with Section 6723 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to failure to comply with other information reporting requirements.

(d) (1) The provisions of Section 6724 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to waiver; definitions, and special rules, apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) Section 6724(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to information return, is modified as follows:

(A) The following references are substituted:

(i) Subdivision (a) of Section 18640, in lieu of Section 6044(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) Subdivision (a) of Section 18644, in
 lieu of Section 6050A(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reports.

(B) References to Sections 4101(d), 6041(b), 6041A(b), 6045(d), 6051(d), and 6053(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code do not apply.

(C) The term “information return” also includes both of the following:

(i) The return required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 18662.

(ii) The return required by subdivision (a) of Section 18631.7.

(3) Section 6724(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to payee statement, is modified as follows:

(A) The
 following references are substituted:
